North Carolina, session 2025, HB360.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 14-122 reads as rewritten:
"§ 14-122. Forgery of deeds, wills and certain other instruments.
(a) General Fraud. – If any person, of his that person's own head and imagination, or by
false conspiracy or fraud with others, shall wittingly and falsely forge and make, or shall cause
or wittingly assent to the forging or making of, or shall show forth in evidence, knowing the same
to be forged, any deed, lease or will, or any bond, writing obligatory, bill of exchange, promissory
note, endorsement or assignment thereof; or any acquittance or receipt for money or goods; or
any receipt or release for any bond, note, bill or any other security for the payment of money; or
any order for the payment of money or delivery of goods, with intent, in any of said instances, to
defraud any person or corporation, and thereof shall be duly convicted, the person so offending
shall be punished as a Class H F felon.
(b) Residential Property Fraud. – In an instance where a violation of this section involves
the forgery of a deed, lease, will, lien, encumbrance, or other conveyance of an interest in real
property relating to residential property, the person so offending shall be punished as a Class D
felon. For the purposes of this subsection, the term "residential property" means real property
where an individual has resided for, consecutively or nonconsecutively, at least six months of a
period of 12 months immediately preceding the forgery."
SECTION 2. Article 4 of Chapter 47 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 47-108.29. Fraudulent instruments.
(a) As used in this section, the following definitions apply:
(1) Instrument. – Any of the following:
a. A transfer of title to real property by deed or other instrument
transferring title to real property.
b. A deed of trust, mortgage, judgment, lien, encumbrance, financing
statement, affidavit, notice, memorandum, or any other instrument that
establishes a security interest in real property.
*H360-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
c. A contract, right of refusal, or any other instrument that purports to
establish an interest, encumbrance, claim, or right relating to real
property.
(2) Suspicious instrument. – An instrument purporting to affect title to real
property described in an order to remove the cloud from the title to real
property entered pursuant to this section if both of the following conditions
are met:
a. The order to remove the cloud from the title to real property remains
in effect.
b. The grantor in the instrument is not the property owner or owners
identified in the order to remove the cloud from the title to real
property.
(b) The actual owner of an interest in real property subject to a recorded false, fictitious,
or fraudulent instrument may seek expedited relief under this section by filing an action in district
court alleging the filing or recording of a false, fictitious, or fraudulent instrument in a public
record or a private record generally available to the public. Upon receipt of a verified filing, the
clerk of superior court shall record, or cause to be recorded and indexed, a memorandum of
possible fraud in the records of the clerk of court or register of deeds where the alleged false,
fictitious, or fraudulent instrument was recorded. The notice shall be served and proof of service
shall be made in any manner provided by the Rules of Civil Procedure for service of summons,
including service by registered mail or certified mail, return receipt requested to all persons
claiming an ownership interest in the property, any lienholder of record, including any person to
whom a security instrument directs notice to be sent and any person obligated to repay the
indebtedness secured by the instrument. Once service has been made, the court shall convene a
hearing. For purposes of the notice requirement in this subsection, the party seeking relief may
serve the person listed as grantor in the recorded purportedly false, fictitious, or fraudulent
instrument at the address listed in the instrument. If the court finds that there is no statutory,
contractual, or other merited legal justification for the instrument, the court shall find that the
recorded instrument is false and is void as a matter of law and shall enter an order to remove the
cloud from the title to the real property. The submission of an original instrument demonstrating
source of title, affidavit, or a lis pendens, notice of previous fraud, or other similar instrument
recorded by the actual owner of an interest in the real property shall be considered evidence of
fraudulent activity. The court may also include in the order any of the following types of relief:
(1) Grant to a prevailing party possession of the real property and order the
ejectment of any party on the premises.
(2) Award attorneys' fees and other costs for the action to the prevailing party.
(3) Upon a finding by the court that an action filed under this section is frivolous
or malicious, assess a civil penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars
($10,000), of which the clear proceeds assessed under this subdivision shall
be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with
G.S. 115C-457.2.
(4) Upon a finding by the court that a party has presented for filing or recording
a false, fictitious, or fraudulent instrument as described in this section more
than once, enter a pre-filing injunction against the party.
(5) Enjoin a party from listing the real property for sale, lease, or any other similar
advertisement.
(c) Upon being presented with an order duly issued by a court of competent jurisdiction
of this State declaring that an instrument already recorded is false and void as a matter of law,
the register of deeds or clerk of superior court that received the recording shall record and
cross-index the court's order finding the instrument to be false. The register of deeds or clerk of
superior court may also conspicuously mark on the first page of the original record previously
Page 2 House Bill 360-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
recorded the following statement: "THE CLAIM ASSERTED IN THIS DOCUMENT IS FALSE
AND IS NOT PROVIDED FOR BY THE GENERAL LAWS OF THIS STATE."
(d) The presentation of an instrument for recording with a register of deeds or a clerk of
superior court that is determined to be materially false, fictitious, or fraudulent shall constitute a
violation of G.S. 75-1.1.
(e) A suspicious instrument that has been recorded after the entry of an order to remove
the cloud from the title of the real property is declared void and unenforceable as a matter of law
with respect to real property described in the instrument in the order. When presented with a
suspicious instrument, the register of deeds or the clerk of court may do any of the following:
(1) Refuse to record the instrument in accordance with G.S. 14-118.6.
(2) Require verification by an attorney licensed in this State that the instrument is
legally authorized in substance and in form under a specified statute.
(3) Notwithstanding G.S. 161-22, refuse to index the instrument in the name of
the non-signing owner of the property solely because the non-signing owner
is referenced in the instrument.
(f) No fee shall be charged for the recording of a memorandum of possible fraud or an
order declaring a recorded instrument to be false submitted in accordance with this section.
(g) The recordation of a memorandum of possible fraud under subsection (b) of this
section shall automatically stay any proceedings involving the real property for a period of 60
days from the recording of the memorandum of possible fraud or the recordation of an order
declaring the recorded instrument false and void as a matter of law, whichever occurs first.
(h) The Administrative Office of the Courts shall develop a form for the expedited relief
filing and memorandum of possible fraud established by this section, and the clerk of superior
court shall make the form available for a petitioner. In addition to the requirements set forth in
this section, the form shall include clear language notifying the filing party that providing false
information or statements is perjury pursuant to G.S. 14-209 and punishable as a Class F felony."
SECTION 3. Article 4 of Chapter 47 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 47-108.30. No presumption of priority for certain recorded instruments.
A deed or conveyance of an interest in real property shall not have a presumption of priority
based upon the time of registration and shall not constitute color of title if any of the following
criteria are met:
(1) The deed or conveyance does not comply with the provisions of G.S. 47-18,
47-20, 47-118, 47-119, 47-119.1, or 47-120, as applicable.
(2) The deed or conveyance does not contain a signature and acknowledgement
of at least one record owner at the time the conveyance is made."
SECTION 4. G.S. 105-303 reads as rewritten:
"§ 105-303. Obtaining information on real property transfers; permanent listing.
(a) To facilitate the accurate listing of real property for taxation, the board of county
commissioners may require the register of deeds to comply with the provisions of subdivision
(a)(1), below, or it may require him to comply with the provisions of subdivision (a)(2), below:
(1) When any conveyance of real property (other than a deed of trust or mortgage)
is recorded, the board of county commissioners may require the register of
deeds to certify to the assessor:
a. The name name, residence address, and, if applicable, current mailing
address of the person conveying the property.
b. The name and name, residence address, and, if applicable, current
mailing address of the person to whom the property is being conveyed.
c. A description of the property sufficient to locate and identify it.
d. A statement as to whether the parcel is conveyed in whole or in part.
House Bill 360-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) When any conveyance of real property (other than a deed of trust or mortgage)
is submitted for recordation, the board of county commissioners may require
the register of deeds to refuse to record it unless it has been presented to the
assessor and the assessor has noted thereon that he has obtained the
information he desires from the conveyance and from the person recording it.
(b) The board of commissioners of each county must install a permanent listing system.
Each county must obtain the approval of the Department of Revenue for its permanent listing
system. Under such a system the provisions of subdivisions (b)(1) through (b)(4) of this
subsection apply.
(1) The assessor is responsible for listing all real property on the abstracts and tax
records each year in the name of the owner of record as of the day as of which
property is to be listed under G.S. 105-285.
(2) Persons whose duty it is to list real property under the provisions of
G.S. 105-302 are relieved of that duty, but annually, during the listing period
established by G.S. 105-307, these persons must furnish the assessor with the
information concerning improvements on and separate rights in real property
required by G.S. 105-309(c)(3) through (c)(5).
(3) The penalties imposed by G.S. 105-308 and 105-312 do not apply to failure
to list real property for taxation, but they apply to failure to comply with the
provisions of subdivision (b)(2) of this subsection with respect to reporting
the construction or acquisition of improvements on and separate rights in real
property. In such a case, the penalty prescribed by G.S. 105-312 shall be
computed on the basis of the tax imposed on the improvements and separate
rights.
(4) The Department of Revenue may authorize the board of county
commissioners to make additional modifications of the listing requirements
of this Subchapter, as long as the modifications do not conflict with
subdivisions (b)(1) through (b)(3) of this subsection."
SECTION 5. Article 2 of Chapter 161 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 161-32. Title certification.
(a) Title Certification. – The board of commissioners of a county may, by resolution,
require the register of deeds not to accept for registration one or more types of conveyances of
real property unless the county tax assessor has certified that the grantors on the instrument are
consistent with the listing for the real property in the county tax records or, in the event of an
inconsistency, legal verification satisfactory to the county tax assessor has been provided for the
source of title, including, but not limited to, deed, will or other inheritance through an estate, or
a court order. The county commissioners may describe the form the certification must take in its
resolution.
(b) Exception to Title Certification. – If a board of county commissioners adopts a
resolution pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, notwithstanding the resolution, the register
of deeds shall accept without certification a conveyance submitted for registration under the
supervision of a closing attorney and containing this statement on the deed: "This instrument
prepared by: ________, a licensed North Carolina attorney, based upon satisfactory verification
of vesting of record title to the property herein through the source of title referenced herein."
(c) As used in this section, the term "conveyance" means a transfer of title to real property
by deed, devise, or other similar instrument."
SECTION 6. Sections 1 and 2 of this act become effective December 1, 2025, and
apply to offenses committed on or after that date. Sections 3 and 4 of this act become effective
July 1, 2025, and apply to instruments and documents presented for registration on or after that
date. The remainder of this act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 4 House Bill 360-First Edition